Utah statutes.
76-9-705.   Participation in an ultimate fighting match.
(1)  For purposes of this section, "ultimate fighting match" means a live
match in which:
(a)  an admission fee is charged;
(b)  match rules permit professional contestants to use a combination of
boxing, kicking, wrestling, hitting, punching, or other combative, contact
techniques; and
(c)  match rules do not:
(i)  incorporate a formalized system of combative techniques against which a
contestant's performance is judged to determine the prevailing contestant;
(ii)  divide a match into two or more equal and specified time periods for a
match total of no more than 50 minutes; or
(iii)  prohibit contestants from:
(A)  using anything that is not part of the human body, except for boxing
gloves, to intentionally inflict serious bodily injury upon an opponent
through direct contact or the expulsion of a projectile;
(B)  striking a person who demonstrates an inability to protect himself from
the advances of an opponent;
(C)  biting; or
(D)  direct, intentional, and forceful strikes to the eyes, groin area, adam's
apple area of the neck, and temple area of the head.
(2)  Any person who publicizes, promotes, conducts, or engages in an ultimate
fighting match is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.
